test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_aaiga_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - aaigâ: # ok 
    aaigâ+N+Sg+Nom:  aaigâ
    aaigâ+N+Sg+Gen:  aiguu
    aaigâ+N+Sg+Acc:  aiguu
    aaigâ+N+Sg+Ill:  aigui
    aaigâ+N+Sg+Loc:  aigust
    aaigâ+N+Sg+Com:  aiguin
    aaigâ+N+Sg+Abe:  aiguuttáá
    aaigâ+N+Ess:  aaigân
    aaigâ+N+Par:  aaigâd
    aaigâ+N+Pl+Nom:  aiguuh
    aaigâ+N+Pl+Gen:  aigui
    aaigâ+N+Pl+Acc:  aiguid
    aaigâ+N+Pl+Ill:  aiguid
    aaigâ+N+Pl+Loc:  aiguin
    aaigâ+N+Pl+Com:  [aiguiguin, aiguigijn]
    aaigâ+N+Pl+Abe:  aiguittáá

  Noun - viistâ: # ok 
    viistâ+N+Sg+Nom:  viistâ
    viistâ+N+Sg+Gen:  vistuu
    viistâ+N+Sg+Acc:  vistuu
    viistâ+N+Sg+Ill:  vistui
    viistâ+N+Sg+Loc:  vistust
    viistâ+N+Sg+Com:  vistuin
    viistâ+N+Sg+Abe:  vistuuttáá
    viistâ+N+Ess:  viistân
    viistâ+N+Par:  viistâd
    viistâ+N+Pl+Nom:  vistuuh
    viistâ+N+Pl+Gen:  vistui
    viistâ+N+Pl+Acc:  vistuid
    viistâ+N+Pl+Ill:  vistuid
    viistâ+N+Pl+Loc:  vistuin
    viistâ+N+Pl+Com:  [vistuiguin, vistuigijn]
    viistâ+N+Pl+Abe:  vistuittáá

  Noun - laavlâ: # ok 
    laavlâ+N+Sg+Nom:  laavlâ
    laavlâ+N+Sg+Gen:  lavluu
    laavlâ+N+Sg+Acc:  lavluu
    laavlâ+N+Sg+Ill:  lavlui
    laavlâ+N+Sg+Loc:  lavlust
    laavlâ+N+Sg+Com:  lavluin
    laavlâ+N+Sg+Abe:  lavluuttáá
    laavlâ+N+Ess:  laavlân
    laavlâ+N+Par:  laavlâd
    laavlâ+N+Pl+Nom:  lavluuh
    laavlâ+N+Pl+Gen:  lavlui
    laavlâ+N+Pl+Acc:  lavluid
    laavlâ+N+Pl+Ill:  lavluid
    laavlâ+N+Pl+Loc:  lavluin
    laavlâ+N+Pl+Com:  [lavluiguin, lavluigijn]
    laavlâ+N+Pl+Abe:  lavluittáá
    
  Noun - toorjâ: # ok 
    toorjâ+N+Sg+Nom:  toorjâ
    toorjâ+N+Sg+Gen:  torjuu
    toorjâ+N+Sg+Acc:  torjuu
    toorjâ+N+Sg+Ill:  torjui
    toorjâ+N+Sg+Loc:  torjust
    toorjâ+N+Sg+Com:  torjuin
    toorjâ+N+Sg+Abe:  torjuuttáá
    toorjâ+N+Ess:  toorjân
    toorjâ+N+Par:  toorjâd
    toorjâ+N+Pl+Nom:  torjuuh
    toorjâ+N+Pl+Gen:  torjui
    toorjâ+N+Pl+Acc:  torjuid
    toorjâ+N+Pl+Ill:  torjuid
    toorjâ+N+Pl+Loc:  torjuin
    toorjâ+N+Pl+Com:  [torjuiguin, torjuigijn]
    toorjâ+N+Pl+Abe:  torjuittáá

  Noun - kiepâ: # ok 
    kiepâ+N+Sg+Nom:  kiepâ
    kiepâ+N+Sg+Gen:  kieppuu
    kiepâ+N+Sg+Acc:  kieppuu
    kiepâ+N+Sg+Ill:  kieppui
    kiepâ+N+Sg+Loc:  kieppust
    kiepâ+N+Sg+Com:  kieppuin
    kiepâ+N+Sg+Abe:  kieppuuttáá
    kiepâ+N+Ess:  kiepân
    kiepâ+N+Par:  kiepâd
    kiepâ+N+Pl+Nom:  kieppuuh
    kiepâ+N+Pl+Gen:  kieppui
    kiepâ+N+Pl+Acc:  kieppuid
    kiepâ+N+Pl+Ill:  kieppuid
    kiepâ+N+Pl+Loc:  kieppuin
    kiepâ+N+Pl+Com:  [kieppuiguin, kieppuigijn]
    kiepâ+N+Pl+Abe:  kieppuittáá
  
  Noun - muotâ: # ok 
    muotâ+N+Sg+Nom:  muotâ
    muotâ+N+Sg+Gen:  muottuu
    muotâ+N+Sg+Acc:  muottuu
    muotâ+N+Sg+Ill:  muottui
    muotâ+N+Sg+Loc:  muottust
    muotâ+N+Sg+Com:  muottuin
    muotâ+N+Sg+Abe:  muottuuttáá
    muotâ+N+Ess:  muotân
    muotâ+N+Par:  muotâd
    muotâ+N+Pl+Nom:  muottuuh
    muotâ+N+Pl+Gen:  muottui
    muotâ+N+Pl+Acc:  muottuid
    muotâ+N+Pl+Ill:  muottuid
    muotâ+N+Pl+Loc:  muottuin
    muotâ+N+Pl+Com:  [muottuiguin, muottuigijn]
    muotâ+N+Pl+Abe:  muottuittáá
